Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Marine  Board, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 7,877,680
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 11,557,988
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 9,029,514
(4) Aquatic invasive species ........... $ 1,692,864
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  State Marine Board, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 294,431
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 4,183,381
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 2,058,239
(4) Aquatic invasive species ........... $ 62,580
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 14, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 2